Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska86-2,109
Electronic communication service; remote computing service; reimbursement for costs; when.

(1) Except as otherwise provided in subsection (3) of this section, a governmental entity obtaining the contents of communications, records, or other information under sections 86-2,104 to 86-2,110 shall pay to the person or entity assembling or providing such information a fee for reimbursement for such costs as are reasonably necessary and which have been directly incurred in searching for, assembling, reproducing, or otherwise providing such information. Such reimbursable costs include any costs due to necessary disruption of normal operations of any electronic communication service or remote computing service in which such information may be stored.

(2) The amount of the fee provided by subsection (1) of this section shall be as mutually agreed by the governmental entity and the person or entity providing the information or, in the absence of agreement, shall be as determined by the court which issued the order for production of such information or the court before which a criminal prosecution relating to such information would be brought if no court order was issued for production of the information.

(3) The requirement of subsection (1) of this section shall not apply with respect to records or other information maintained by a provider that relate to telephone toll records and telephone listings obtained under section 86-2,106. The court may, however, order a payment as described in subsection (1) of this section if the court determines the information required is unusually voluminous in nature or otherwise caused an undue burden on the provider.

Laws 1988, LB 899, § 20;

R.S.1943, (1999), § 86-707.14;

Laws 2002, LB 1105, § 171.